Alaska statutes. Title 45. Trade and Commerce.
Article 4. Miscellaneous Provisions.

Sec. 45.27.300.
Other rights and remedies.

The provisions of this chapter do not limit other rights and remedies that may be available to the owner of a product under other provisions of law. This section does not create a new cause of action against an authorized dealer who sells or attempts to repair a product found to be nonconforming.

History.

(§ 2 ch 28 SLA 2009)

Sec. 45.27.310.
Applicability.

The provisions of this chapter apply to a dealership agreement if the dealership agreement is between a manufacturer and an authorized dealer in this state.

History.

(§ 2 ch 28 SLA 2009)

Sec. 45.27.320.
Jurisdiction; venue.

This state has jurisdiction over a legal dispute between a manufacturer located in or outside this state and an authorized dealer located in this state, and the dispute is governed by, interpreted, and adjudicated under the law of this state.

Venue for court action involving a dispute under (a) of this section is in the judicial district of this state in which the authorized dealer’s principal place of business is located.

History.

(§ 2 ch 28 SLA 2009)

Cross references. —

For the effect of this section on Rule 3, Alaska Rules of Civil Procedure, relating to a dispute between a manufacturer and an authorized dealer, see § 5, ch. 28, SLA 2009, in the 2009 Temporary and Special Acts.

Sec. 45.27.330.
Corporate affiliates.

A manufacturer may not use a subsidiary corporation, affiliated corporation, partnership, association, or other person to do what the manufacturer is prohibited from doing under this chapter.

The provisions of (a) of this section do not limit the right of a person to engage in reasonable and appropriate business practices consistent with an existing trade practice that is not prohibited by this chapter.

History.

(§ 2 ch 28 SLA 2009)

Sec. 45.27.340.
Unenforceable provisions.

If a provision in a dealership agreement violates this chapter, the provision is not enforceable.

History.

(§ 2 ch 28 SLA 2009)